Rhode Island, session 2025, SB652.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Legislative Findings.
The general assembly finds and declares that:
(1) Rhode Island is committed to a clean environment and protection of its natural
resources;
(2) The life of Rhode Island resource recovery's central landfill is not expected to exceed
2038, with limited ability to expand and/or relocate;
(3) Rhode Island has embarked innovative solutions to tackle its environmental challenges,
including "Let's Recycle Right." In 2021 CNBC ranked Rhode Island 46th in its annual "Top States
for Business." Innovative solutions are ready to put Rhode Island closer to the top of the list;
(4) Economic recovery in Rhode Island, post COVID is important to the well-being of all
Rhode Islanders;
(5) Rhode Island is committed to a clean environment and protection of its natural
resources. The U.S. Environmental Protection Agency has recognized that reusing and recycling
materials conserves natural resources, reduces waste, prevents pollution, reduces greenhouse
gasses contributing to climate change and serves as an important economic driver, helping to create
jobs and tax revenue; and
(6) The purpose of this chapter is to facilitate globally recognized state of the art
technologies in Rhode Island as they relate to clean, post-consumer recycled plastic. Rhode Island
stands to be the leader in New England joining over fifteen (15) states who have adopted this

legislation. Rhode Island has the potential to be nationally and internationally recognized as a state
that is encouraging innovation, by looking to the future in solving its environmental challenges.
SECTION 2. Section 23-18.9-7 of the General Laws in Chapter 23-18.9 entitled "Refuse
Disposal" is hereby amended to read as follows:
23-18.9-7. Definitions.
As used in this chapter, the following terms shall, where the context permits, be construed
as follows:
(1) "Advanced recycling" means a manufacturing process for the conversion of post-use
polymers and recovered feedstock into basic hydrocarbon raw materials, feedstocks, chemicals,
and other products like waxes and lubricants through thermochemical processes that convert
plastics into their basic molecular components. The recycled products produced at advanced
recycling facilities include, but are not limited to, recycled plastics, monomers, oligomers, plastics,
plastics and chemical feedstocks, basic and unfinished chemicals, waxes, lubricants, and coatings.
Advanced recycling shall not be considered resource recovery, materials recovery, treatment,
utilization, conversion, waste processing, reconstituting, waste management, incineration,
combustion, or disposal.
(2) "Advanced recycling facility" means a facility that receives, stores and converts post-
use polymers and recovered feedstocks it receives using advanced recycling. An advanced
recycling facility is a manufacturing facility subject to applicable department manufacturing
regulations for air, water, waste, and land use. Advanced recycling facilities shall not include solid
waste management facilities, waste processing facilities, resource recovery facilities, materials
recovery facilities, intermediate processing facilities, or incinerators.
(1)(3) “Beneficial reuse material” means a processed, nonhazardous, solid waste not
already defined as recyclable material by this chapter and by regulations of the Rhode Island
department of environmental management that the director has determined can be reused in an
environmentally beneficial manner without creating potential threats to public health, safety,
welfare, or the environment or creating potential nuisance conditions.
(2)(4) “Beneficial use determination” (BUD) means the case-by-case process by which the
director evaluates a proposal to use a specific solid waste as a beneficial reuse material for a specific
purpose at a specific location within the host municipality.
(3)(5) “Cocktailing” means the adding, combining, or mixing of hazardous waste as
defined in § 23-19.1-4 with construction debris and demolition debris.
(4)(6) “Construction and demolition (C&D) debris” means non-hazardous solid waste
resulting from the construction, remodeling, repair, and demolition of utilities and structures and
LC002241 - Page 2 of 14

uncontaminated solid waste resulting from land clearing. This waste includes, but is not limited to,
wood (including painted, treated, and coated wood, and wood products); land-clearing debris; wall
coverings; plaster; drywall; plumbing fixtures; non-asbestos insulation; roofing shingles and other
roof coverings; glass; plastics that are not sealed in a manner that conceals other wastes, empty
buckets ten (10) gallons or less in size and having no more than one inch of residue remaining on
the bottom; electrical wiring and components containing no hazardous liquids; and pipe and metals
that are incidental to any of the previously described waste. Solid waste that is not C&D debris
(even if resulting from the construction, remodeling, repair, and demolition of utilities, structures
and roads; land clearing) includes, but is not limited to, asbestos; waste; garbage; corrugated
container board; electrical fixtures containing hazardous liquids, such as fluorescent light ballasts
or transformers; fluorescent lights; carpeting; furniture; appliances; tires; drums; containers greater
than ten gallons (10 gals.) in size; any containers having more than one inch of residue remaining
on the bottom; and fuel tanks. Specifically excluded from the definition of construction and
demolition debris is solid waste (including what otherwise would be construction and demolition
debris) resulting from any processing technique, other than that employed at a department-approved
C&D debris processing facility, that renders individual waste components unrecognizable, such as
pulverizing or shredding.
(5)(7) “Construction and demolition debris processing facility” means a solid waste
management facility that receives and processes construction and demolition debris. These
facilities must demonstrate, through records maintained at the facility and provided to the
department, that seventy-five percent (75%) of all material received by the facility is processed and
removed from the site within six (6) weeks of receipt on a continuous basis, and that in no case
stores material on site for over three (3) months; provided, however, these facilities do not include
municipal compost facilities.
(6)(8) “Construction and demolition debris separation facility” means a facility that
receives, separates, and/or screens construction and demolition debris into its components for
subsequent resale or processing that includes, but is not limited to, grinding, shredding, crushing,
or landfilling at another location separate and apart from the location on which the separation
occurs.
(7)(9) “Director” means the director of the department of environmental management or
any subordinate or subordinates to whom the director has delegated the powers and duties vested
in him or her by this chapter.
(8)(10) “Expansion” means any increase in volume, size, or scope, either vertically,
horizontally, or otherwise; provided, however, that this section does not apply to the vertical
LC002241 - Page 3 of 14

expansion of the Charlestown municipal landfill until the closure date of July 1, 2000.
(9)(11) “Person” includes an individual, firm, partnership, association, and private or
municipal corporation.
(12) "Post-use polymer" means a plastic polymer to which all of the following apply:
(i) It is derived from any industrial, commercial, agricultural, or domestic activities;
(ii) It is not mixed with solid waste or hazardous waste onsite or during conversion at the
advanced recycling facility;
(iii) The plastic's use or intended use is as a feedstock for the manufacturing of feedstocks,
other basic hydrocarbons, raw materials, or other intermediate products or final products using
advanced recycling;
(iv) The plastic has been sorted from solid waste and other regulated waste but may contain
residual amounts of solid waste such as organic material and incidental contaminants or impurities
(e.g., paper labels and metal rings); and
(v) The plastic is converted at an advanced recycling facility or held at such facility prior
to conversion. Post-use polymer shall not be considered co-mingled recyclable materials.
(13)(i) "Recovered feedstock" means one or more of the following materials, derived from
recoverable waste, that has been converted so that it may be used as feedstock in an advanced
recycling facility:
(A) Post-use polymers; and/or
(B) Materials for which the United States Environmental Protection Agency has made a
nonwaste determination under 40 C.F.R. 241.3(c) or has otherwise determined are feedstock and
not solid waste.
(ii)(A) Recovered feedstock does not include unprocessed municipal solid waste.
(B) Recovered feedstock is not mixed with solid waste or hazardous waste onsite or during
conversion at an advanced recycling facility.
(C) Recovered feedstock shall not be considered co-mingled recyclable materials.
(10)(14) “Recyclable materials” means those materials separated from solid waste for
reuse. The director of the department of environmental management, through regulations, shall
specify those materials that are to be included within the definition of recyclables. The materials to
be included may change from time to time depending upon new technologies, economic conditions,
waste stream characteristics, environmental effects, or other factors.
(11)(15) “Segregated solid waste” means material separated from other solid waste for
reuse, but does not include, post-use polymers or recovered feedstocks that are:
(i) Converted at an advanced recycling facility;
LC002241 - Page 4 of 14

(ii) Held at such a facility prior to conversion to ensure production is not interrupted; or
(iii) Stored offsite with the intent that they will be converted at an advanced recycling
facility, but before delivery to such a facility.
(12)(16) “Solid waste” means garbage, refuse, tree waste as defined by subsection (14) of
this section, and other discarded solid materials generated by residential, institutional, commercial,
industrial, and agricultural sources, but does not include solids or dissolved material in domestic
sewage or sewage sludge or dredge material as defined in chapter 6.1 of title 46, nor does it include
hazardous waste as defined in chapter 19.1 of this title, nor does it include used asphalt, concrete,
or Portland concrete cement. Solid waste does not include post-use polymers or recovered
feedstocks that are:
(i) Converted at an advanced recycling facility;
(ii) Held at such a facility prior to conversion; or
(iii) Stored offsite with the intent that they will be converted at an advanced recycling
facility, but before delivery to such a facility.
(13)(17) “Solid waste management facility” means any plant, structure, equipment, real
and personal property, except mobile equipment or incinerators with a capacity of less than one
thousand pounds (1,000 lbs.) per hour, operated for the purpose of processing, treating, or disposing
of solid waste but not segregated solid waste. Any solid waste management facility that stores waste
materials containing gypsum on site over three (3) months must install and maintain an active gas
collection system approved by the department of environment management. Solid waste
management facilities do not include advanced recycling facilities.
(14)(18) (i) “Tree waste” means all parts of a tree, including stumps, branches, and logs
that shall be considered solid waste for purposes of this chapter unless the tree waste meets the
following criteria:
(A) The tree waste remains on the property where it was generated; or
(B) The tree waste remains in the possession of the person who generated it and is stored
above the ground surface, on property that the same person controls, for purposes of recycling and
reuse; or
(C) The tree waste, whether generated on or off-site, is being actively managed as a usable
wood product such as landscape mulch, wood chips, firewood, or mulch.
(ii) The application of the criteria set forth in this section shall not be deemed to abrogate,
diminish, or impair the enforcement of the requirements established pursuant to chapter 28.1 of this
title or the authority of the state and/or a city or town to protect the public health, safety, or welfare
from a public nuisance resulting from the storage and handling of tree waste.
LC002241 - Page 5 of 14

(15)(19) “Organic waste material” means the organic material portion of the solid waste
stream, including, but not limited to, food scraps, food processing residue, and soiled or
unrecyclable paper that has been separated from nonorganic material.
(16)(20) “Composting facility” means land, appurtenances, structures, or equipment where
organic materials originating from another process or location that have been separated at the point
or source of generation from nonorganic material are recovered using a process of accelerated
biological decomposition of organic material under controlled aerobic conditions.
(17)(21) “Anaerobic digestion facility” means a facility employing a closed vessel to
perform a closed process of accelerated biodegradation of organic materials and/or organic solid
wastes into biogas and digestate, using microorganisms under controlled conditions in the absence
of oxygen.
(18)(22) “Other authorized recycling method” means:
(i) Recycling organic waste material on site or treating organic waste material via on-site
organic treatment equipment permitted pursuant to the general laws or federal law; or
(ii) Diverting organic waste material for agricultural use, including consumption by
animals.
(19)(23) “Covered entity” means each commercial food wholesaler or distributor,
industrial food manufacturer or processor, supermarket, resort or conference center, banquet hall,
restaurant, religious institution, military installation, prison, corporation, hospital or other medical
care institution, and casino.
(20)(24) “Covered educational institution” means a higher educational or research
institution.
(21)(25) “Covered educational facility” means a building or group of two (2) or more
interconnected buildings owned or used by a covered educational institution at which organic waste
materials are generated.
SECTION 3. Title 23 of the General Laws entitled "HEALTH AND SAFETY" is hereby
amended by adding thereto the following chapter:
CHAPTER 18.19
PLASTICS RECYCLING MANDATE
23-18.19-1. Definitions.
The following terms and phrases used in this chapter shall, where context permits, be
construed as follows:
(1) "Advanced recycling feedstocks" means post-use polymer and recovered feedstocks.
Advanced recycling feedstocks shall not be considered solid wastes.
LC002241 - Page 6 of 14

(2) "Advanced recycling product" means materials produced through mass balance
attribution and/or directly through conversion of advanced recycling feedstocks using advanced
recycling processes, and include, but are not limited to, monomers, oligomers, plastics, plastics and
chemical feedstocks, specialty chemicals, basic chemicals, chemical intermediates, unfinished
chemicals, waxes, lubricants, coatings, asphalt blends, other basic hydrocarbons, and other
products. Advanced recycling products shall not be considered solid waste.
(3) "Approved certification system" means an accounting and recordkeeping program
developed by the director to facilitate implementation of the plastic recycling mandate.
(4) "Attribution" means a methodology by which a manufacturer using mass balance under
an approved certification system attributes an equivalent mass of the advanced recycling feedstocks
inputted into its advanced recycling process, adjusted for losses, across the mass of one or more of
the advanced recycling products manufactured in connection with that process.
(5) "Certified compostable products" means products that are certified by a recognized
third-party independent verification body as meeting international standard specifications ASTM
D6400, "Specifications for Labeling of Plastics Designed to be Aerobically Composed in
Municipal or Industrial Facilities" or ASTM D6868 "Standard Specification for Labeling of End
Items that Incorporate Plastics and Polymers as Coatings or Additives with Paper and Other
Substrates Designed to be Aerobically Composted in Municipal or Industrial Facilities," as
amended.
(6) "Consumer commodity" or "commodity" means any article, product, good or
commodity of any kind or class which is customarily produced or distributed for sale through retail
sales agencies or instrumentalities for consumption or use.
(7) "Mass balance" means an auditable chain of custody method that enables the attribution
of the mass of advanced recycling feedstocks to one or more advanced recycling products produced
in connection with the advanced recycling process within a predefined system boundary and within
a given booking period (usually one year) and adjusted for losses.
(8) "Marketers" means persons which:
(i) Either manufacture or purchase manufactured consumer commodities, food or
beverages, and
(ii) Enclose, contain, store, protect, preserve, or identify those consumer commodities, food
or beverages in plastic packaging for sale, market, or distribution within the state.
(9) "Mechanical recycling" means operations that recycle plastic via physical processes,
such as grinding, washing, separating, drying, melting, re-granulating, and compounding.
(10) "Plastic" means any material made of polymeric organic compounds derived from
LC002241 - Page 7 of 14

monomers and additives that can be shaped by flow.
(11) "Plastics packaging" means any immediate container or wrapping in which the
principal structural element is composed of plastics that is used to enclose, contain, store, protect,
preserve, transport, or identify consumer commodities, food, or beverages for use in the sale of the
consumer commodities, food, or beverages.
(12) "Recycled plastics" or "recycled plastic" means plastics certified under an approved
certification system and produced:
(i) From mechanical recycling using pre-consumer recovered materials, and post-consumer
materials; or
(ii) From advanced recycling feedstocks or advanced recycling products using mass
balance attribution. The term "recycled content" shall have the same meaning as recycled plastics.
Recycled plastics shall not be considered solid waste.
23-18.19-2. Mandates.
(a) Applicability.
(1) Entities subject to the minimum mandate for recycled plastics in plastics packaging in
their annual portfolios are marketers.
(2) Recycled plastics or the feedstocks and/or materials used to produce recycled plastics
can be sourced within or outside the state.
(3) The mandate shall apply to marketers’ total annual portfolio of plastics packaging in
the state, except for plastics packaging:
(i) Manufactured from certified compostable products; or
(ii) Subject to electrostatic discharge restrictions.
(b) Minimum annual recycled plastics mandate. Not later 2030, a marketer’s annual
portfolio of plastics packaging sold, marketed, and distributed in the state shall include thirty
percent (30%) recycled plastics.
(c) A person subject to the minimum mandate for recycled plastics in plastic packaging in
their annual portfolio not in compliance with this act shall submit to the department a plan subject
to departmental approval to comply with this chapter.
23-18.19-3. Air monitoring.
Each advanced recycling facility shall deploy and operate an air monitoring station to
measure the concentrations of pollutants in the ambient air pursuant to standards set forth in federal
and state law. A minimum of five (5) continuous air samplers are required. One shall be located on
or near the building where the advanced recycling process takes place, and one each within one
hundred feet (100') of the north, south, east and west property lines of the advanced recycling
LC002241 - Page 8 of 14

facility. The air monitoring station and samplers shall be continuous and operational at all times
that the facility is operational. The advanced recycling facility shall send a report of the air
monitoring to the host municipality governing body at least annually. The host municipality may,
by ordinance, require additional reports and specific data.
23-18.19-4. Location of advanced recycling facility.
(a) Notwithstanding any other law, rule, or regulation to the contrary, no permit or license
shall be issued for the construction or operation of an advanced recycling facility, and no
application for a permit or license for such a facility shall be granted or issued by the state unless
the facility:
(1) Is located within a one mile radius of a state facility, which may include the Rhode
Island resource recovery corporation or Narragansett Bay Commission; and
(2) Is located in a designated industrial zone or commercial port facility that does not abut
a residential community; and
(3) Is located in a designated industrial zone or commercial port facility that does not abut
an environmental justice area; and
(4) Is located within a single municipality a minimum of one mile from any bordering
municipality and state border.
(b) State facilities located within an area zoned for residential development are prohibited
from locating an advanced recycling facility within the residential area.
SECTION 4. Section 23-19-5 of the General Laws in Chapter 23-19 entitled "Rhode Island
Resource Recovery Corporation" is hereby amended to read as follows:
23-19-5. Definitions.
The following words and phrases have the meanings ascribed to them in this section unless
the context clearly indicates otherwise:
(1) "Advanced recycling" means a manufacturing process for the conversion of post-use
polymers and recovered feedstocks into basic hydrocarbon raw materials, feedstocks, chemicals,
and other products like waxes and lubricants through thermochemical processes that convert
plastics into their basic molecular components. The recycled products produced at advanced
recycling facilities include, but are not limited to, certified recycled plastics, monomers, oligomers,
plastics, plastics and chemical feedstocks, basic and unfinished chemicals, waxes, lubricants, and
coatings. Advanced recycling shall not be considered resource recovery, materials recovery,
treatment, utilization, conversion, waste processing, reconstituting, waste management,
incineration, combustion, or disposal.
(2) "Advanced recycling facility" means a facility that receives, stores and converts post-
LC002241 - Page 9 of 14

use polymers and recovered feedstocks it receives using advanced recycling. An advanced
recycling facility is a manufacturing facility subject to applicable department manufacturing
regulations for air, water, waste, and land use. Advanced recycling facilities shall not include solid
waste management facilities, resource recovery facilities, materials recovery facilities, intermediate
processing facilities, waste processing facilities, or incinerators.
(1)(3) “Bonds and notes” means bonds, including without limitation refunding bonds,
notes, including without limitation renewal notes and bond anticipation notes, and other obligations
or evidences of indebtedness of the corporation issued pursuant to the provisions of this chapter
and the resolutions of the corporation.
(2)(4) “Central landfill” means the central landfill located in Johnston.
(3)(5) “Corporation” means the Rhode Island resource recovery corporation created and
established pursuant to this chapter.
(4)(6) “Landfill revenues” means the surplus, if any, of all tipping fees and other revenues
received at the central landfill over the annual costs of the landfill, and a pro-rata share of the
corporation’s administrative expenses.
(5)(7) “Municipal solid waste” means that solid waste generated by the residents of a
municipality in the course of their daily living, the disposal of which the governing body of that
municipality has undertaken in the discharge of its duties to protect the health of the municipality.
Municipal solid waste does not include solid waste generated by residents of a municipality in the
course of their employment or that generated by any manufacturing or commercial enterprise.
(6)(8) “Municipal solid waste disposal arrangements” means those arrangements entered
into by a municipality which provide for the final disposal of wastes in a manner approved by the
department of health, the department of environmental management, and the corporation; provided,
however, that the disposal of wastes in transfer stations or facilities for interim storage shall not
constitute final disposal of the wastes.
(7)(9) “Municipality” means any town or city within the state.
(8)(10) “Person” means any individual, firm, institution, partnership, association or
corporation, public, or private, organized or existing under the laws of the state or other states
including federal corporations, but excluding municipalities.
(11) "Post-use polymer" means a plastic polymer to which all of the following apply:
(i) It is derived from any industrial, commercial, agricultural, or domestic activities;
(ii) It is not mixed with solid waste or hazardous waste onsite or during conversion at the
advanced recycling facility;
(iii) The plastic’s use or intended use is as a feedstock for the manufacturing of feedstocks,
LC002241 - Page 10 of 14

blendstocks, other basic hydrocarbons, raw materials, or other intermediate products or final
products using advanced recycling;
(iv) The plastic has been sorted from solid waste and other regulated waste but may contain
residual amounts of solid waste such as organic material and incidental contaminants or impurities
(e.g., paper labels and metal rings); and
(v) The plastic is converted at an advanced recycling facility or held at such facility prior
to conversion. Post-use polymer shall not be considered co-mingled recyclable materials.
(9)(12) “Project” means the design, acquisition, ownership, operation, construction,
rehabilitation, improvement, development, sale, lease, or other disposition of, or the provision of
financing for, any solid waste management facility or the industrial and/or business parks in the
town of Johnston authorized by § 23-19-9(a)(7) and the highway access authorized by § 23-19-
10.3.
(13)(i) "Recovered feedstock" means one or more of the following materials, derived from
recoverable waste, that has been converted so that it may be used as feedstock in an advanced
recycling facility:
(A) Post-use polymers; and/or
(B) Materials for which the United States Environmental Protection Agency has made a
nonwaste determination under 40 C.F.R. 241.3(c) or has otherwise determined are feedstocks and
not solid waste.
(ii)(A) Recovered feedstock does not include unprocessed municipal solid waste.
(B) Recovered feedstock is not mixed with solid waste or hazardous waste onsite or during
conversion at an advanced recycling facility.
(C) Recovered feedstock shall not be considered co-mingled recyclable materials.
(10)(14) “Recyclable materials” means those materials separated from solid waste for
reuse. The director of the department of environmental management through regulations shall
specify those materials that are to be included within the definition of recyclables. The materials to
be included may change from time to time depending upon new technologies, economic conditions,
characteristics of the waste stream, environmental effects, or other factors.
(11)(15) “Recycling” means the reuse of recovered resources in manufacturing,
agriculture, power production, or other processes.
(12)(16) “Resource recovery” means the processing of solid wastes in such a way as to
produce materials or energy that may be used in manufacturing, agriculture, and other processes.
(13)(17) “Resource recovery system” means the corporation’s integrated system of
resource recovery consisting of a series of waste processing facilities designed to process a
LC002241 - Page 11 of 14

minimum of seventy percent (70%) of the municipal and commercial solid waste streams by
employing an on-site waste separation technology for the purpose of recycling and/or reusing a
minimum of seventy percent (70%) of the solid waste stream, and minimal use of landfills for the
purpose of providing temporary backup or bypass landfill capacity and residue disposal from waste
processing facilities and any other related facilities and services.
(14)(18) “Resource recovery system costs” means all operating costs of the system; debt
service and other financing costs related to the resource recovery system; the costs of recycling
grants-in-aid and similar obligations of the corporation; allocations for extraordinary and
unexpected costs; and a pro-rata share of the corporation’s administrative expenses.
(15)(19) “Resource recovery system revenues” means all amounts received by the
corporation as municipal tipping fees, non-municipal tipping fees, energy revenues, revenues from
the sale of recyclable materials, and all other revenues received with respect to the resource
recovery system, but shall not include any landfill revenues and any amounts received as a state
subsidy.
(16)(20) “Revenues” means monies or income received by the corporation in whatever
form, including but not limited to fees, charges, lease payments, interest payments on investments,
payments due and owing on account of an instrument, contract, or agreement between the
corporation, any municipality, or person, gifts, grants, or any other monies or payments to which
the corporation is entitled under the provisions of this chapter or any other law, or of any agreement,
contract, or indenture.
(17)(21) “Segregated solid waste” means material which has been separated from the waste
stream at the generation source for the purpose of recovering and recycling the materials but does
not include post-use polymers or recovered feedstocks.
(18)(22) “Solid waste” means garbage, refuse, sludge from a waste treatment plant, water
supply treatment plant, or air pollution control facility and other discarded materials, including
solid, liquid, semisolid, or contained gaseous material generated by residential, institutional,
commercial, industrial, and agricultural sources but does not include solids or dissolved materials
in domestic sewage. Solid waste does not include post-use polymers or recovered feedstocks.
(19)(23) “Solid waste management facility” means any plant, structure, equipment, and
other property, real, personal, or mixed, or the modification or replacement of any of the foregoing,
for the receipt, storage, treatment, utilization, processing, transporting, or final disposition of or
recovery of resources from solid waste other than segregated solid waste, or any facility which
disposes of solid waste by reconstituting, converting, or otherwise recycling it into material which
is not waste; or any property or system to be used in whole or in part for any of the previously
LC002241 - Page 12 of 14

mentioned purposes, whether or not another purpose is also served by it; or any other property or
system incidental to, or which has to do with, or the end purpose of which, is any of the foregoing;
or any combination of two (2) or more of the foregoing. Solid waste management facilities shall
not include advanced recycling facilities.
(20)(24) “Statewide resource recovery system development plan” means that plan which
will specify the location, size, and type of solid waste management facilities that may be required
to develop an integrated statewide resource recovery system for the effective management of solid
waste in Rhode Island. It will also specify a proposed schedule by which the component facilities
will be phased into the statewide system, and it will provide for the administrative and financial
requirements for implementing the plan.
(21)(25) “Waste management” means actions taken to effectuate the receipt, storage,
transportation, and processing for resource recovery and recycling, or for the ultimate disposal, of
solid waste.
(22)(26) “Waste processing facility” means a solid waste facility employing recycling
based technology employing an on-site waste separation technology designed to process both
nonsource separated and source separated solid waste for the purpose of recycling, and/or
composting, and/or reusing a minimum of seventy percent (70%) of the municipal and commercial
solid waste streams.
SECTION 5. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC002241
========
LC002241 - Page 13 of 14